District of Columbia statutes.
10-1141.06

Surcharge authorization.

Each public utility company regulated by the Public Service Commission shall recover from its utility customers all lease payments which it pays to the District of Columbia pursuant to this title through a surcharge mechanism applied to each unit of sale and the surcharge amount shall be separately stated on each customer’s monthly billing statement.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 606, 43 DCR 4569
1981 Ed., § 7-1076.
See Historical and Statutory Notes to § 10-1141.01.
See notes to § 10-1141.01.